Massachusetts, session 194th, H101.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 111 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the
following section:-
Section 239. The United Nations has declared health a fundamental human right
indispensable for the exercise of other human rights and that the right to health is closely related
to and dependent upon the realization of other human rights, as contained in the International Bill
of Rights, including the rights to food, housing, work, education, human dignity, life, non-
discrimination, equality, the prohibition against torture, privacy, access to information, and the
freedoms of association, assembly and movement. Broadband internet access is now an essential
component of the realization of many of these human rights and is itself a human right.
of 2

The department shall make a study into broadband internet access in the commonwealth
and its relation to the public health objectives of the commonwealth. Said study shall be
conducted for the purposes of understanding how broadband internet access is a determinant of
health, improving the public health services of the commonwealth, and expanding broadband
internet throughout the Commonwealth to reflect its status as a human right, with a focus on
communities that have suffered disproportionate health impacts as a result of lack of access to
broadband internet.
SECTION 2. Section 32 of chapter 121B of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2018
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the word “cost”, in line 6, the following
words:- ,with broadband internet available in all units offered at no charge to residents
considered a requirement of a decent, safe and sanitary dwelling
SECTION 3.The first paragraph of said section 32, as so appearing, is hereby amended
by inserting after the third sentence the following sentence:- For the purposes of this paragraph,
broadband internet shall not be considered a utility.
SECTION 4. Said first paragraph of said section 32, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by adding the following sentence:- Funds to subsidize housing authorities or other
public housing bodies for implementation and maintenance of the requirement of no charge
broadband internet for all units shall be appropriated by the general court. The undersecretary
shall administer these funds.
of 2